District of Columbia statutes.
50-2305.01

Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application of such provision to any person or circumstances shall be held unconstitutional or otherwise invalid, the constitutionality or validity or the remainder of this chapter and the applicability of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

History

Sept. 12, 1978, D.C. Law 2-104, § 701, 25 DCR 1275

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-641.
1973 Ed., § 40-1126.